Montana, session 2025, HB485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Construction contract bids -- requirements. (1) In a residential home
construction contract, a party may not increase the bid amount if the bid is already accepted. The accepted
construction bid constitutes the full financial obligations of the parties relating to agreed-on construction
services.

(2) (A) A RESIDENTIAL HOME CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT MAY NOT BE A TIME AND MATERIALS CONTRACT
UNLESS AGREED ON BY THE PARTIES IN WRITING.

(B) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION (2), "TIME AND MATERIALS CONTRACT" MEANS A
RESIDENTIAL HOME CONSTRUCTION CONTRACT IN WHICH A CLIENT PAYS A CONTRACTOR BASED ON THE ACTUAL COST
OF MATERIALS USED AND THE HOURLY RATE FOR ACTUAL LABOR SPENT ON THE RESIDENTIAL HOME UNTIL THE
CONSTRUCTION IS COMPLETED.
(3) This section does not apply:
(A) if the parties agree in writing, prior to the acceptance of the bid, that the bid does not constitute
the final amount of money owed for the construction services provided; OR
(B) TO AGREED-ON CHANGES IN THE SCOPE OF WORK, CHANGES IN MATERIALS COST, OR CHANGES IN
BIDS FROM SUBCONTRACTORS.

- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 485

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0485.2
NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 28, chapter 2, and the provisions of Title 28, chapter 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 485